Missouri, session 2026, SB1347.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 208, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 208.286, to read as
follows:
208.286. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Candy", a product that involves the preparation
of sugar or artificial sweeteners in combination with
chocolate, fruit, nuts, caramels, gummies, hard candies, or
other ingredients and flavorings in the form of bars, drops,
or pieces;
(2) "Certain beverages", shall include the following:
(a) Carbonated and noncarbonated soft drinks,
including, but not limited to, colas, ginger ale, near-beer,
root beer, lemonade, and orangeade;
(b) All other drinks or punches with natural fruit or
vegetable juice that contain fifty percent or less by volume
natural fruit or vegetable juice;
(c) Beverage mixes and ingredients intended to be made
into taxable beverages; liquid or frozen, concentrated,

SB 1347 2
dehydrated, powdered, granulated, sweetened or unsweetened,
or seasoned or unseasoned; or
(d) Concentrates intended to be made into beverages
that contain fifty percent or less by volume natural fruit
or vegetable juice;
(3) "Prepared desserts", a processed, shelf-stable,
ready-to-eat, prepackaged sweet food intended for immediate
consumption without any further preparation, including, but
not limited to, foods substantially consisting of chemically
modified substances extracted from foods with additives to
enhance taste, texture, appearance, and durability and with
minimal whole foods.
2. The director of the department of social services
shall request a waiver from the U.S. Department of
Agriculture to exclude candy, prepared desserts, and certain
beverages from the definition of eligible foods under 7 CFR
271.2. If such waiver is granted, then the director shall
prohibit the purchase of candy, prepared desserts, and
certain beverages with benefits provided through the
supplemental nutrition assistance program. If no waiver is
granted, then the director shall annually request a waiver
until the waiver is granted.
✓